District of Columbia statutes.
38-2402.02

Gifts.

The University and NTID are authorized to receive by gift, devise, bequest, purchase, or otherwise, property, both real and personal, for the use of the University or NTID, or for the use, as appropriate, for any programs, departments, or other units as may be designated in the conveyance or will, and to hold, invest, use, or dispose of such property for the purpose stated in the conveyance or will.

Aug. 4, 1986, 100 Stat. 781, Pub. L. 99-371, § 402
renumbered as § 202, Oct. 16, 1992, 106 Stat. 2151, Pub. L. 102-421, §§ 101(b)(6), 132
1981 Ed., § 31-1842.2b.